North Carolina statutes. Chapter 136. Transportation.
Article 2. Powers and Duties of Department and Board of Transportation.

§ 136-17.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1973, c. 507, s. 3.

§ 136-17.1.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1977, c. 464, s. 13.

§ 136-17.2.
Members of the Board of Transportation represent entire State.

The chairman and members of the Board of Transportation shall represent the entire State in transportation matters and not represent any particular person, persons, or area. The Board shall, from time to time, provide that one or more of its members or representatives shall publicly hear any person or persons concerning transportation matters in each of said geographic areas of the State.

History.

1973, c. 507, s. 3; 1977, c. 464, s. 7.1; 1987, c. 783, s. 3; 1993, c. 483, s. 3.

Local Modification.

Village of Bald Head Island: 1997-324, s. 1.

§ 136-17.2A.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2013-183, s. 4.3, effective July 1, 2013.

History.

1989, c. 692, s. 1.4; c. 770, s. 74.7; 1999-237, ss. 27.19, 27.20(a); 1999-422, s. 2; 2000-134, s. 22; 2005-403, s. 3; 2009-497, s. 1; 2010-31, ss. 28.8, 28.10; 2010-165, s. 3; 2012-42, s. 2; repealed by 2013-183, s. 4.3, effective July 1, 2013.